California, session 20252026, AB845.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 57.2 is added to the Labor Code, to read:57.2. (a) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature and notwithstanding any other law, upon intake of a complaint from an agricultural employee by any department, division, or board within the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the appropriate entity shall collaborate with each other and take all reasonable efforts to transmit the complaint to the appropriate entity for processing and investigation.(2) In transmitting a complaint to the appropriate entity, the transmitting entity shall not disclose the identity and personal information of the agricultural employee complainant to the extent prohibited by law without their consent.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Agricultural employee” means a person employed in any of the following:(A) An agricultural occupation, as defined in Wage Order No. 14 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(B) An industry preparing agricultural products for the market, on the farm, as defined in Wage Order No. 13 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(C) An industry handling products after harvest, as defined in Wage Order No. 8 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(2) “Appropriate entity” includes, but is not limited to, the Agricultural Labor Relations Board, Department of Industrial Relations, Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, Division of Occupational Safety and Health, or Employment Development Department.(3) “Reasonable efforts” shall be consistent with each entity’s confidentiality requirements, including, but not limited to, subdivision (c) of Section 6309.